New Mexico, session 2026, HB30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 22-10B-4 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2020,
Chapter 25, Section 4, as amended) is amended to read:
"22-10B-4. TEACHER RESIDENCY PROGRAM COMPONENTS.--A
teacher residency program established pursuant to the Teacher
Residency Act shall include:

A. competitive admission requirements with

multiple criteria;

B. rigorous department-approved teacher

preparation program coursework, which shall be offered while

the teaching resident undertakes a full academic year of

guided apprenticeship in the classroom of a level two or
HB 30
Page 1

level three teacher at the partner school district or charter
school;
C. a co-teaching approach to expose teaching
residents to a variety of teaching methods, philosophies and
classroom environments;
D. clear criteria for the selection of level two
and level three teachers based on measures of teacher
effectiveness and the appropriate subject area knowledge;
E. providing level two and level three teachers
with ongoing evidence-based training in coaching and
mentoring teaching residents and compensation for time and
added responsibility;
F. grouping teaching residents in cohorts to
facilitate professional collaboration among residents and
placing teaching residents in teaching schools or
professional development programs that are organized to
support a high-quality teacher learning experience in a

supportive work environment;

G. measures of appropriate progress through the

program;

H. for a teaching resident who is an

undergraduate, a stipend of no less than sixty-five percent

of the statutory minimum salary for a level one teacher and,

for a teaching resident who has a bachelor's degree, a

stipend of no less than eighty percent of the statutory
HB 30
Page 2

minimum salary for a level one teacher;
I. a stipend of no less than two thousand dollars
($2,000) per year for level two and level three teachers
participating in the program;
J. a stipend of no less than two thousand dollars
($2,000) per year for principals or head administrators at
the partner school district or charter school;
K. funding of no less than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) per year for teacher residency program coordinators
at each department-approved New Mexico teacher residency
program;
L. a post-completion commitment by teaching
residents to serve a minimum of three years at a public
school;
M. an expectation of an offer of employment to the
teaching resident from the partner school district or charter
school, depending on the district's or charter school's

staffing needs and the resident's performance;

N. support for teaching residents for not less

than one year following the resident's completion of the

program through the provision of mentoring, professional

development and networking opportunities; and

O. demonstration of the integral role and

responsibilities of the partner school district or charter

school in fulfilling the purpose of the program." HB 30
Page 3